Wisconsin, session 2025, SB925.
do enact as follows:SB925,11Section 1. 5.056 of the statutes is amended to read:SB925,3,225.056 Matching program with secretary of transportation. The 3commission administrator shall enter into the agreement with the secretary of 4transportation specified under s. 85.61 (1) to match personally identifiable 5information on the official registration list maintained by the commission under s. 66.36 (1) and the information specified in s. ss. 6.256 (2) and 6.34 (2m) with 7personally identifiable information maintained by the department of 8transportation. Subject to s. 343.14 (2p) (b), the agreement shall provide for the 1electronic transfer of information under s. 6.256 (2) to the commission on a 2continuous basis, no less often than monthly.SB925,23Section 2. 6.256 of the statutes is created to read:SB925,3,946.256 Commission shall facilitate registration of electors. (1) Except 5as provided for individuals specified in sub. (8), and as otherwise expressly 6provided, the commission shall use all feasible means to facilitate the registration of 7all eligible electors of this state who are subject to a registration requirement and 8the maintenance of the registration of all eligible electors for so long as an elector 9remains eligible.SB925,3,1310(2) Subject to s. 343.14 (2p) (b), for the purpose of carrying out its functions 11under sub. (1), the commission shall obtain the following information from the 12department of transportation, to the extent that the department has the 13information:SB925,3,1714(a) The full name of each individual who holds a current operator’s license 15issued to the individual under ch. 343 or a current identification card issued to the 16individual under s. 343.50, together with the following information pertaining to 17that individual:SB925,3,19181. The current address of the individual together with any address history 19and any name history maintained by the department of transportation.SB925,3,20202. The date of birth of the individual.SB925,3,21213. The number of the license or identification card issued to the individual.SB925,4,3224. A copy of the document that the individual provided as proof of citizenship 23and a statement from the department of transportation indicating that the 1department verified the individual’s citizenship. For purposes of this subdivision, a 2document that meets the requirements under 42 USC 1320b-7 (d) shall be 3considered valid proof of citizenship.SB925,4,64(b) For each item of information specified in this subsection, the most recent 5date that the item of information was provided to or obtained by the department of 6transportation.SB925,4,167(3) The commission shall compare the information obtained under sub. (2) 8with the information in the registration list under s. 6.36 (1) (a). If the commission 9finds discrepancies between the information obtained under sub. (2) regarding an 10elector and the information in the registration list under s. 6.36 (1) (a) regarding 11that same elector, the commission shall contact the elector by mail or telephone or 12in person to resolve the discrepancies. If the commission is able to resolve the 13discrepancies after contacting the elector, the commission shall update the 14information on the registration list. If the commission is unable to contact the 15elector, the commission shall resolve any discrepancies in favor of the information in 16the registration list.SB925,5,617(4) Except as provided in this subsection and sub. (8), if the commission 18concludes that an individual appears eligible to vote in this state but is not 19registered, and the commission has obtained from reliable sources all the 20information required under s. 6.33 (1) to complete the individual’s registration, the 21commission shall enter the individual’s name on the registration list. If the 22commission has not obtained from reliable sources all the information pertaining to 23an individual that is required under s. 6.33 (1), the commission shall attempt to 1obtain from reliable sources the necessary information under s. 6.33 (1) that is 2required to complete the individual’s registration. If an elector’s status has been 3changed from eligible to ineligible under s. 6.50 (2) or (2g) and the elector’s 4eligibility, name, or residence has not changed, the commission may not change the 5individual’s name to eligible status unless the commission first verifies that the 6individual is eligible and wishes to change his or her status to eligible.SB925,5,97(5) The commission shall attempt to contact an individual described in sub. 8(4) if necessary to obtain all the information specified in s. 6.33 (1) pertaining to the 9individual that is required to complete the individual’s registration.SB925,5,1210(6) If the commission is able to obtain all the required information specified in 11s. 6.33 (1) pertaining to an individual, the commission shall enter the name of the 12individual on the registration list maintained under s. 6.36 (1) (a).SB925,5,1713(7) The commission shall mail a notice to each individual whose name the 14commission enters under sub. (6) on the registration list maintained under s. 6.36 15(1) (a). The notice shall be printed in English, Spanish, and other languages spoken 16by a significant number of state residents, as determined by the commission, and 17shall include all of the following:SB925,5,2018(a) A statement informing the individual that his or her name has been 19entered on the registration list and showing the current address for the individual 20based on the commission’s records.SB925,5,2221(b) A statement informing the individual that he or she may request to have 22his or her name deleted from the registration list and instructions for doing so.SB925,5,2323(c) Instructions for notifying the commission of a change in name or address.SB925,6,21(d) Instructions for obtaining a confidential listing under s. 6.47 (2) and a 2description of how an individual qualifies for a confidential listing.SB925,6,153(8) Any individual may file a request with the commission to exclude his or 4her name from the registration list maintained under s. 6.36 (1) (a). Any individual 5whose name is added to the registration list by the commission may file a request 6with the commission or a municipal clerk to have his or her name deleted from the 7list. A request for exclusion or deletion shall be filed in the manner prescribed by 8the commission. An individual who files an exclusion or deletion request under this 9subsection may revoke his or her request by the same means that an individual may 10request an exclusion or deletion. The commission shall ensure that the name of any 11individual who has filed an exclusion or deletion request under this subsection is 12excluded from the registration list or, if the individual’s name appears on the list, is 13removed from the registration list and is not added to the list at any subsequent 14time unless the individual files a revocation of his or her request under this 15subsection.SB925,6,2316(9) If the commission removes from the registration list the name of an elector 17who does not request that his or her name be deleted, other than to correct an entry 18that the commission positively determines to be a duplication or to change the name 19of an individual who is verified to be deceased to ineligible status, the commission 20shall mail to the individual a notice of the removal or change in status by 1st class 21postcard to the individual’s last-known address. The notice shall provide that the 22individual may apply to have his or her status changed to eligible if he or she is a 23qualified elector.SB925,7,31(10) The commission shall attempt to facilitate the initial registration of all 2eligible electors, except as otherwise provided in this section, no later than July 1, 32029.SB925,7,74(11) The commission shall maintain the confidentiality of all information 5obtained from the department of transportation under sub. (2) and may use this 6information only for the purpose of carrying out its functions under sub. (1) and s. 76.34 (2m) and in accordance with the agreement under s. 85.61 (1).SB925,38Section 3. 85.61 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB925,7,20985.61 (1) The secretary of transportation and the administrator of the 10elections commission shall enter into an agreement to match personally 11identifiable information on the official registration list maintained by the 12commission under s. 6.36 (1) and the information specified in s. ss. 6.256 (2) and 136.34 (2m) with personally identifiable information in the operating record file 14database under ch. 343 and vehicle registration records under ch. 341 to the extent 15required to enable the secretary of transportation and the administrator of the 16elections commission to verify the accuracy of the information provided for the 17purpose of voter registration. Notwithstanding ss. 110.09 (2), 342.06 (1) (eg), and 18343.14 (2j), but subject to s. 343.14 (2p) (b), the agreement shall provide for the 19transfer of electronic information under s. 6.256 (2) to the commission on a 20continuous basis, no less often than monthly.SB925,421Section 4. 343.14 (2p) of the statutes is created to read:SB925,8,322343.14 (2p) (a) The forms for application for a license or identification card or 23for renewal thereof shall inform the applicant of the department’s duty to make 1available to the elections commission the information described in s. 6.256 (2) for 2the purposes specified in s. 6.256 (1) and (3) and shall provide the applicant an 3opportunity to elect not to have this information made available for these purposes.SB925,8,94(b) If the applicant elects not to have the information described in s. 6.256 (2) 5made available for the purposes specified in s. 6.256 (1) and (3), the department 6may not make this information available for these purposes. This paragraph does 7not preclude the department from making available to the elections commission 8information for the purposes specified in s. 6.34 (2m) or for any purpose other than 9those specified in s. 6.256 (1) and (3).SB925,510Section 5. Nonstatutory provisions.SB925,8,1611(1) Initial sharing of registration information. Notwithstanding ss. 1285.61 (1), 110.09 (2), 342.06 (1) (eg), and 343.14 (2j), the department of 13transportation shall enter into and begin transferring information under a revised 14agreement with the elections commission administrator pursuant to s. 85.61 (1) no 15later than the first day of the 4th month beginning after the effective date of this 16subsection.SB925,9,817(2) Report on voter registration information integration. No later 18than July 1, 2028, the elections commission shall report to the appropriate standing 19committees of the legislature, in the manner specified in s. 13.172 (3), its progress 20in initially implementing a system to ensure the complete and continuous 21registration of all eligible electors in this state, specifically including the operability 22and utility of information integration with the department of transportation and 23the feasibility and desirability of integrating public information maintained by 1other state agencies and by technical colleges with the commission’s registration 2information to enhance the completeness and accuracy of the information. At a 3minimum, the report shall contain an assessment of the feasibility and desirability 4of the integration of registration information with information maintained by the 5departments of health services, children and families, workforce development, 6revenue, safety and professional services, and natural resources; the University of 7Wisconsin System; and the technical college system board, as well as the technical 8colleges within each technical college district.SB925,9,99